tr: Raket/Kürek malzemesi: Alüminyum; Karbon fiber; Kompozit; Fiberglas; Ahşap; Diğer
da: Padle-/åremateriale: Aluminum; Kulfiber; Komposit; Glasfiber; Træ; Andet
cs: Materiál pádla/vesla: Hliník; Uhlíkové vlákno; Kompozitní; Skelná vata; Dřevo; Jiné
en: Paddle/Oar material: Aluminum; Carbon fiber; Composite; Fiberglass; Wood; Other
de: Paddel/Rudermaterial: Aluminium; Kohlenstofffaser; Zusammengesetzt; Fiberglas; Holz; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 桨/橹材质: 铝; 碳纤维; 复合材料; 玻璃纤维; 木头; 其他
ko: 패들/노 재료: 알루미늄; 탄소 섬유; 복합물; 유리 섬유; 목재; 기타
zh-TW: 槳的材質: 鋁; 碳纖維; 複合; 玻璃纖維; 木材; 其他
el: Υλικό κουπιού: Αλουμίνιο; Ανθρακόνημα; Σύνθετο υλικό; Υαλοβάμβακας; Ξύλο; Άλλο
ja: パドル/オール材質: アルミニウム; カーボンファイバー; 複合; ガラス繊維; 木材; その他
ru: Материал весла/лопатки: Алюминий; Углеродное волокно; Композит; Стекловолокно; Дерево; Другое
nb: Padle-/åremateriale: Aluminium; Karbonfiber; Kompositt; Glassfiber; Trevirke; Annet
hu: Evezőlapát anyaga: Alumínium; Szénszál; Kompozit; Üveggyapot; Fa; Egyéb
vi: Vật liệu mái chèo: Nhôm; Sợi carbon; Tổng hợp; Sợi thủy tinh; Gỗ; Khác
it: Materiale pagaia/remo: Alluminio; Fibra di carbonio; Composito; Vetroresina; Legno; Altro
lt-LT: Irklo medžiaga: Aliuminis; Anglies pluoštas; Kompozitas; Stiklo pluoštas; Mediena; Kita
es: Material de la pala/remo: Aluminio; Fibra de carbono; Compuesto; Fibra de vidrio; Madera; Otros
nl: Materiaal Peddel-/roeispaan: Aluminium; Koolstofvezel; Composiet; Glasvezel; Hout; Andere
pl: Materiał pagaju/wiosła: Aluminium; Włókno węglowe; Kompozyt; Włókno szklane; Drewno; Inne
sk-SK: Materiál pádla/vesla: Hliník; Uhlíkové vlákno; Kompozit; Sklolaminát; Drevo; Iné
pt-BR: Material de remo: Alumínio; Fibra de carbono; Composto; Fibra de vidro; Madeira; Outro
pt-PT: Material do paddle/remo: Alumínio; Fibra de carbono; Composto; Fibra de vidro; Madeira; Outro
ro-RO: Material padelă/vâslă: Aluminiu; Fibră de carbon; Compozit; Fibră de sticlă; Lemn; Altele
bg-BG: Материал на греблото/веслото: Алуминий; Въглеродни влакна; Композит; Fiberglass; Дърво; Други
sl-SI: Material vesla: Aluminij; Ogljikova vlakna; Kompozit; Steklena vlakna; Les; Drugo
fi: Melan/airon materiaali: Alumiini; Hiilikuitu; Komposiitti; Lasikuitu; Puu; Muu
sv: Paddel/åra - material: Aluminium; Kolfiber; Sammansatt; Glasfiber; Trä; Övrigt
fr: Matériau de la pagaie/rame: Aluminum; Fibre de carbone; Composite; Fibre de verre; Bois; Autre
th: วัสดุไม้พาย/ไม้กรรเชียง: อะลูมิเนียม; เส้นใยคาร์บอน; วัสดุคอมโพสิต; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; ไม้; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Materijal vesla: Aluminij; Karbonska vlakna; Kompozit; Stakloplastika; Drvo; Ostalo